Maryland, session 2026, SB0087.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
12–301.
(a) On application, the Administration shall issue an identification card to any
applicant who:
(1) Is a resident of this State;
(2) Does not have a driver’s license;
(3) Presents a birth certificate or other proof of age and identity acceptable
to the Administration;
(4) Provides satisfactory documentary evidence that the applicant has
lawful status;
– 1 –

Ch. 117 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) (i) Provides satisfactory documentary evidence that the applicant
has a valid Social Security number by presenting the applicant’s Social Security
Administration account card or, if the Social Security Administration account card is not
available, any of the following documents bearing the applicant’s Social Security number:
1. A current W–2 form;
2. A current SSA–1099 form;
3. A current non–SSA–1099 form; or
4. A current pay stub with the applicant’s name and Social
Security number on it; or
(ii) Provides satisfactory documentary evidence that the applicant is
not eligible for a Social Security number; and
(6) Presents a completed application for an identification card on a form
furnished by the Administration.
(g) (2) The card shall contain:
(v) A [color] photograph of the applicant taken by the procedure that
the Administration requires;
16–111.1.
(d) (2) A noncommercial Class A, B, C, or M license shall include:
(iv) A [color] photograph of the applicant that is taken in accordance
with a procedure that the Administration requires;
16–122.
(d) Each identification card, moped operator’s permit, and license to drive issued
or renewed in accordance with this section shall:
(3) Be of the size and design that the Administration requires,
tamperproof, to the extent possible, and contain:
(v) A [color] photograph of the applicant taken by the procedure that
the Administration requires;
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 117
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 3 –